Illinois, session 104th, HB3007.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by adding 5Section 2e as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/2e new)7    Sec. 2e. Waterway motor fuel tax allowable use.8    (a) As used in this Section, "waterway purposes" means the 9maintenance, repair, construction, and upkeep costs related to 10the Chain O'Lakes. 11    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the moneys 12received by the Department under this Law on taxes imposed on 13the sale of motor fuel sold on the Chain O'Lakes shall be 14remitted back to the Chain O'Lakes - Fox River Waterway 15Management Agency or to the Department of Natural Resources. 16All of the taxes collected on those sales of motor fuel must be 17used for waterway purposes.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.